Massachusetts, session 194th, H5139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts Department of Fish and Game, through the Division of 
Fisheries and Wildlife shall conduct a review of their Guidelines for Managing Recreational Use 
of Beaches to Protect Piping Plovers, Terns, and Their Habitats in Massachusetts not less than 
once every two years. 
SECTION 2. In conducting the review required under Section 1, the Division of Fisheries 
and Wildlife shall actively consult with all applicable municipal or regional beach managers 
responsible for the oversight and enforcement of said guidelines. 
SECTION 3. The Massachusetts Division of Fisheries and Wildlife shall convene at least 
two public hearings during each review period to solicit public comment. Notice of the hearing 
shall be posted no fewer than fourteen days in advance. Such hearing shall be held within an 

of 2 11 applicable community; provided, however, that no single community shall host the hearing in 
two consecutive review periods.